Utah statutes.
76-10-922.   Attorney General Litigation Fund.
(1) (a)  There is created a special revenue fund known as the Attorney General
Litigation Fund for the purpose of providing funds to pay for any costs and
expenses incurred by the state attorney general in relation to actions under
state or federal antitrust, criminal laws, or civil proceedings under Title
13, Chapter 44, Protection of Personal Information Act.  These funds are in
addition to other funds as may be appropriated by the Legislature to the
attorney general for the administration and enforcement of the laws of this
state.
(b)  At the close of any fiscal year, any balance in the fund in excess of
$2,000,000 shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(c)  The attorney general may expend money from the Attorney General
Litigation Fund for the purposes in Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  All money received by the state or its agencies by reason of any
judgment, settlement, or compromise as the result of any action commenced,
investigated, or prosecuted by the attorney general, after payment of any
fines, restitution, payments, costs, or fees allocated by the court, shall be
deposited in the Attorney General Litigation Fund, except as provided in
Subsection (2)(b).
(b) (i)  Any expenses advanced by the attorney general in any of the actions
under Subsection (1)(a) shall be credited to the Attorney General Litigation
Fund.
(ii)  Any money recovered by the attorney general on behalf of any private
person or public body other than the state shall be paid to those persons or
bodies from funds remaining after payment of expenses under Subsection
(2)(b)(i).
(3)  The Division of Finance shall transfer any money remaining in the
Antitrust Revolving Account on July 1, 2002, to the Attorney General
Litigation Fund created in Subsection (1).
